Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.140

Garbage—Notice of lien—Foreclosure.

A notice of the city's or town's lien for garbage collection and disposal service specifying the charges, the period covered by the charges and giving the legal description of the premises sought to be charged, shall be filed with the county auditor within the time required and shall be foreclosed in the manner and within the time prescribed for liens for labor and material.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.21.140. Prior: 1943 c 270 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 9504-1, part.]